North Carolina statutes. Chapter 66. Commerce and Business.
Article 14. Business Under Assumed Name Regulated.

§§ 66-68 through 66-71.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-100, s. 1, as amended by Session Laws 2017-23, s. 1, effective December 1, 2017.

History.

G.S. 66-68

; 1913, c. 77, s. 1; C.S., s. 3288; 1951, c. 381, ss. 3, 7; 1967, c. 823, s. 28; 1977, c. 384; 1985, c. 264; 1987, c. 723, ss. 1, 2; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1031, s. 4; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1030, s. 18; 1999-189, s. 6; 2000-140, s. 101(t); repealed by 2017-23, s. 1, effective December 1, 2017. G.S. 66-69; 1913, c. 77, s. 2; C.S., s. 3299; 1951, c. 381, ss. 4, 7; 1967, c. 823, s. 29; 1987, c. 723, s. 3; repealed by 2017-23, s. 1, effective December 1, 2017. G.S. 69.1; 1913, c. 77, s. 2; C.S., s. 3299; 1951, c. 381, ss. 5, 7; 1967, c. 823, s. 30; repealed by 2017-23, s. 1, effective December 1, 2017. G.S. 66-71; 1913, c. 77, s. 4; 1919, c. 2; C.S., s. 3291; 1951, c. 381, ss. 6, 7; 1987, c. 723, s. 4; 1993, c. 539, s. 517; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); repealed by 2017-23, s. 1, effective December 1, 2017.

Cross References.

For present similar provisions, see the Assumed Business Name Act, Article 14A of Chapter 66,

G.S. 66-71.1

et seq.